Hawaii, session 2026, SB2754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a thriving democracy depends on an engaged, informed, and empowered citizenry.  Yet the systems that sustain democratic participationcritical thinking, media literacy, collaborative problem-solving, and knowledge of governmental processesmust be intentionally cultivated.  For students, education received in middle school or intermediate school is a pivotal period in which young people form lasting understandings of their role in public life and their connection to community, government, and aina.  To meet this moment, Hawaii's public schools require stable, dedicated resources that expand opportunities for students to develop civic knowledge and the habits of democratic participation. The legislature further finds that existing funding structures do not adequately support the development of civic knowledge for students.  Civic education is often reliant on uneven school-level capacity, discretionary funds, or short-term grants that cannot sustain long-range program design.  These structural gaps limit access to experiential civic learning, professional development for social studies teachers, and curriculum aligned with Hawaii's civic-mission priorities.  Without a reliable funding mechanism, the State's obligation to prepare young people for informed participation in our shared governance is weakened, and disparities in civic opportunity widen. The legislature also finds that to address the systemic challenges that impede the pursuit of civic knowledge, a special fund dedicated solely to advancing civic education in Hawaii's public middle and intermediate schools is needed.  By establishing a permanent, purpose-restricted funding source, the legislature affirms that civic education is a core public good essential to the health of our democratic systems and will ensure that every middle and intermediate school student in Hawaii, regardless of geography, income, or school resources, has meaningful access to high-quality civic-learning opportunities that prepare them to participate fully in the life of the State's democracy. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen Hawaii's civic infrastructure by establishing a civic education grant program and civic education trust fund and dedicating their use exclusively to support civic education in Hawaii's public middle and intermediate schools. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-A  Civic education grant program; establishment; administration.  (a)  There is established within the department for administrative purposes a civic education grant program, to be administered by the department's office of curriculum and instructional support services, to support public middle and intermediate schools in providing civic education to students through department approved programming. (b) Applications for grants shall be made to the department.  At a minimum, the applicant shall: (1)  Provide a detailed plan outlining the scope, objectives, and projected impact of the project or projects and a clear breakdown of how grant funds will be used; (2)  Agree to use state funds exclusively for the purposes of this program; (3)  Indicate capability to properly use the grant for the purpose of the grant program; (4)  Comply with all applicable federal and state laws prohibiting discrimination against any person on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, age, sexual orientation, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal or state law; (5)  Agree not to use state funds for purposes of entertainment or perquisites; (6)  Comply with other requirements as the department may prescribe; (7)  Comply with all applicable federal, state, and county statutes, rules, and ordinances; (8)  Agree to indemnify and save harmless the State of Hawaii and its officers, agents, and employees from and against any and all claims arising out of or resulting from activities carried out or projects undertaken with funds provided hereunder and procure sufficient insurance to provide this indemnification if requested to do so by the department; and (9)  Agree to make available to the department all records the applicant may have relating to the grant to allow state agencies to monitor the applicant's compliance with this subsection. (c) Grant awards shall be funded by the civic education trust fund established pursuant to section 302A-B; provided that no grant shall be awarded without the approval of a social studies educational specialist pursuant to section 302A-B(d). (d)  Each participating school shall submit an annual report to the department no later than December 1 of each year on how awarded grant funds were used to further civic education, including updates or status reports on the following: (1)  Implementation of civic education programming and curriculum; (2)  Teacher development; and (3)  Progress in meeting any evaluation metrics for civic education programming as established by the department. (e)  The department of education shall compile the reports received from participating schools pursuant to subsection (d) into one report and submit the report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (f)  The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. §302A-B  Civic education trust fund; established.  (a)  There is established within the state treasury a civic education trust fund to be administered by the office of curriculum and instructional support services of the department. (b) The civic education trust fund shall consist of: (1)  Any appropriations made by the legislature; (2)  Grants, gifts, and donations from public sources, including federal funding, or private sources; and (3)  Interest or other income earned from the investment of moneys in the fund. (c) The department shall expend moneys in the civic education trust fund exclusively to support civic education programming, curriculum implementation, teacher professional development, and student civic-learning opportunities in public middle and intermediate schools, including through the provision of funding for grants under the civic education grant program established pursuant to section 302A-A. (d) Expenditures from the civic education trust fund shall be approved by a social studies educational specialist, as designated by the superintendent. (e) The department shall submit an annual report on the civic education trust fund to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session.  The report shall include: (1)  Expenditures from and contributions to the trust fund during the preceding fiscal year; and (2)  Results and outcomes achieved from expenditures from the trust fund. (f) Moneys deposited into or appropriated to the trust fund shall remain available until they are obligated or until the trust fund is terminated.  If the trust fund is terminated, all funds, including interest or other income earned from the investment of moneys in the fund, shall be transferred to the general fund." SECTION 3.  In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________